West Virginia, session 2026, HB4231.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 6. Authorization for Department of homeland security to promulgate legislative rules. §64-6-1. Fire Commission. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on June 3, 2025, authorized under the authority of §15A-11-3 of this code, modified by the Fire Commission to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on October 6, 2025, relating to the Fire Commission (fire code, 87 CSR 01), is authorized.